Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 25 O.S. 2021, Section 304, as last
amended by Section 3, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2024 (25 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 304), is amended to read as follows:
Section 304. As used in the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act:
1. "Public body" means the governing bodies of all
municipalities located within this state, boards of county
commissioners of the counties in this state, boards of public and
higher education in this state and all boards, bureaus, commissions,
HB1108 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

agen cies, trusteeships, authorities, councils, committees, public
trusts or any entity created by a public trust including any
committee or subcommittee composed of any of the members of a public
trust or other legal entity receiving funds from the Rural Economic
Action Plan Fund as authorized by Section 2007 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, task forces or study groups in this state
supported in whole or in part by public funds or entrusted with the
expending of public funds, or administering public property, and
shall include all committees or subcommittees of any public body,
and shall include the Judicial Nominating Commission as established
in Section 3 of Article VII-B of the Oklahoma Constitution. Public
body shall not include the state judiciary, the Council on Judicial
Complaints when conducting, discussing, or deliberating any matter
relating to a complaint received or filed with the Council, the
Legislature, or administrative staffs of public bodies including,
but not limited to, faculty meetings and athletic staff meetings of
institutions of higher education when those staffs are not meeting
with the public body, or entry-year assistance committees.
Furthermore, public body shall not include the multidisciplinary
teams provided for in Section 1-9-102 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes, in Section 10-115 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
and in subsection C of Section 1-502.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes or any school board meeting for the sole purpose of
considering recommendations of a multidisciplinary team and deciding
HB1108 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the placement of any child who is the subject of the
recommendations. Furthermore, public body shall not include
meetings conducted by stewards designated by the Oklahoma Horse
Racing Commission pursuant to Section 203.4 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes when the stewards are officiating at races or
otherwise enforcing rules of the Commission. Furthermore, public
body shall not include the board of directors of a Federally
Qualified Health Center or the postadjudication review boards
provided for in Sections 1116.2 and 1116.3 of Title 10 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
2. "Meeting" means the conduct of business of a public body by
a majority of its members being personally together or, as
authorized by Section 307.1 of this title, together pursuant to a
videoconference. Meeting shall not include informal gatherings of a
majority of the members of the public body when no business of the
public body is discussed;
3. "Regularly scheduled meeting" means a meeting at which the
regular business of the public body is conducted;
4. "Special meeting" means any meeting of a public body other
than a regularly scheduled meeting or emergency meeting;
5. "Emergency meeting" means any meeting called for the purpose
of dealing with an emergency. For purposes of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act, an emergency is defined as a situation involving injury
to persons or injury and damage to public or personal property or
HB1108 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

imme diate financial loss when the time requirements for public
notice of a special meeting would make such procedure impractical
and increase the likelihood of injury or damage or immediate
financial loss;
6. "Continued or reconvened meeting" means a meeting which is
assembled for the purpose of finishing business appearing on an
agenda of a previous meeting. For the purposes of the Oklahoma Open
Meeting Act, only matters on the agenda of the previous meeting at
which the announcement of the continuance is made may be discussed
at a continued or reconvened meeting;
7. "Videoconference" means a conference among members of a
public body remote from one another who are linked by interactive
telecommunication devices or technology and/or technology permitting
both visual and auditory communication between and among members of
the public body and/or between and among members of the public body
and members of the public. During any videoconference, both the
visual and auditory communications functions shall attempt to be
utilized; and
8. "Teleconference" means a conference among members of a
public body remote from one another who are linked by
telecommunication devices and/or technology permitting auditory
communication between and among members of the public body and/or
between and among members of the public body and members of the
public.
HB1108 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.





















HB1108 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.